Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:(1) Beginning July 1, 2027, subject to the conditions in subsection (2) of this section, each year beginning on October 1st through March 1st of the following year, every hospital shall offer immunizations for influenza to each inpatient of the hospital who is 65 years of age or older and each inpatient who, regardless of age, has one or more chronic health conditions, unless that immunization for influenza is contraindicated for the inpatient.(2) Offers to immunize an inpatient under subsection (1) of this section are subject to the availability of the influenza vaccine at the hospital at the time the inpatient is physically present and receiving services at the hospital.(3) A hospital is not required to comply with the requirements of this section during a declared state of emergency or any other disaster or catastrophic event that substantially affects or increases the need for health care services.(4) A critical access hospital certified under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-4 is not required to comply with the requirements of this section.--- END ---